Vermont, session 2025-2026, S48.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 540 is amended to read:
§ 540. WORKFORCE EDUCATION AND EMPLOYMENT AND
TRAINING LEADER LEADERS
(a) The Commissioner of Labor and the Executive Director of the Office of
Workforce Strategy and Development shall be the leader leaders of workforce
education and employment and training in the State, and shall have the
authority and responsibility for the coordination of workforce education and
training within State government, including the following duties: the State’s
workforce system as provided in this section.
VT LEG #379545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.48
2025 Page 2 of 10
(b) The powers and duties provided in this section shall not limit, restrict,
or suspend any similar powers the Commissioner of Labor or the Executive
Director of the Office of Workforce Strategy and Development may have
under other provisions of law.
(c) For purposes of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act
(WIOA), the Department of Labor shall be designated as the State Workforce
Agency and the Commissioner of Labor shall serve as the State Workforce
Administrator.
(d) As coleader of workforce education and employment and training in the
State, the Commissioner of Labor, in consultation with the Executive Director
of the Office of Workforce Strategy and Development where appropriate,
shall:
(1) Perform the following duties in consultation with the State
Workforce Development Board: ensure the coordination and administration of
workforce education and employment and training programs operated by the
Department of Labor;
(A) advise the Governor on the establishment of an integrated system
of workforce education and training for Vermont;
(B) create and maintain an inventory of all existing workforce
education and training programs and activities in the State;
VT LEG #379545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.48
2025 Page 3 of 10
(C) use data to ensure that State workforce education and training
activities are aligned with the needs of the available workforce, the current and
future job opportunities in the State, and the specific credentials needed to
achieve employment in those jobs;
(D) develop a State plan, as required by federal law, to ensure that
workforce education and training programs and activities in the State serve
Vermont citizens and businesses to the maximum extent possible;
(E) ensure coordination and nonduplication of workforce education
and training activities;
(F) identify best practices and gaps in the delivery of workforce
education and training programs;
(G) design and implement criteria and performance measures for
workforce education and training activities;
(H) establish goals for the integrated workforce education and training
system; and
(I) with the assistance of the Secretaries of Commerce and
Community Development, of Human Services, of Education, of Agriculture,
Food and Markets, and of Transportation and of the Commissioner of Public
Safety, develop and implement a coordinated system to recruit, relocate, and
train workers to ensure the labor force needs of Vermont’s businesses are met.
VT LEG #379545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.48
2025 Page 4 of 10
(2) Require from each business, training provider, or program that
receives State funding to conduct workforce education and training a report
that evaluates the results of the training. Each recipient shall submit its report
on a schedule determined by the Commissioner and shall include at least the
following information: enter into agreements, to the extent necessary, with
other State agencies and departments for services to improve the employment
and economic outcomes for individuals receiving public assistance, including
agreements to provide customized or specialized services that are beyond the
basic services required by federal law;
(A) name of the person who receives funding;
(B) amount of funding;
(C) activities and training provided;
(D) number of trainees and their general description;
(E) employment status of trainees; and
(F) future needs for resources.
(3) Review reports submitted by each recipient of workforce education
and training funding. develop strategies and provide support to entities
responsible for federal investments in the State’s workforce system;
(4)(A) Issue an annual report to the Governor, the House Committees on
Appropriations and on Commerce and Economic Development, and the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Economic Development, Housing and
VT LEG #379545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.48
2025 Page 5 of 10
General Affairs on or before December 1 that includes a systematic evaluation
of the accomplishments of the State workforce investment system and the
performance of participating agencies and institutions. The provisions of 2
V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to
be made under this subdivision. develop strategies designed to reduce
employee layoffs and business closures; and
(B) provide reemployment services to employees affected by layoffs
and closures;
(5) Coordinate public and private workforce programs to ensure that
information is easily accessible to students, employees, and employers, and
that all information and necessary counseling is available through one contact.
administer a system where employment and training resources are provided to
individuals and businesses through both physical and virtual service delivery
methods;
(6) Facilitate effective communication between the business community
and public and private educational institutions. establish job centers in such
parts of the State as the Commissioner deems necessary and evaluate such
centers on an as-needed basis;
(7) maintain a free and secure electronic job board that, to the extent
practicable, compiles all available job, registered apprenticeship, education and
VT LEG #379545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.48
2025 Page 6 of 10
training, and credentialing opportunities that support job seekers and career
advancers;
(7)(8) Notwithstanding any provision of State law to the contrary, and to
the fullest extent allowed under federal law, ensure that in each State and
State-funded workforce education and training program, the program
administrator collects and reports data and results at the individual level by
Social Security number or an equivalent. use data to ensure that State
workforce education and employment and training activities are aligned with
the needs of the:
(A) available workforce;
(B) employers to fill their current and future job openings; and
(C) specific credentials required by employers;
(8)(9) Coordinate intentional outreach and connections between students
graduating from Vermont’s colleges and universities and employment
opportunities in Vermont. require that each business, training provider, or other
entity receiving State funding to conduct workforce training submit a report
that evaluates the results of the training; and
(10) notwithstanding any provision of State law to the contrary, and to
the fullest extent allowed under federal law, ensure that the program
administrator in each State and State-funded workforce education and
VT LEG #379545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.48
2025 Page 7 of 10
employment and training program collects and reports data and results at the
individual level by Social Security number or equivalent.
(e) As coleader of workforce education and employment and training in the
State, the Executive Director of the Office of Workforce Strategy and
Development, in consultation with the Commissioner of Labor and the State
Workforce Development Board where appropriate, shall:
(1) advise the Governor and members of the Governor’s cabinet on the
establishment and management of an integrated system of workforce education
and training in Vermont;
(2) coordinate across public and private sectors to identify and address
labor force needs and ensure that workforce development program information
is easily accessible to students, employees, and businesses;
(3) develop a comprehensive workforce strategy that contains
measurable statewide workforce goals along with a biennial operational plan to
achieve those goals that shall:
(A) be developed in collaboration with, and representative of,
workforce system partners, including public, private, nonprofit, and
educational sectors and the State Workforce Development Board;
(B) include a set of metrics, designed in consultation with the Agency
of Administration’s Chief Performance Office, used to evaluate the
VT LEG #379545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.48
2025 Page 8 of 10
effectiveness of, to the extent practicable, all workforce development
programs;
(C) align with and build upon other required strategic planning
efforts, including the WIOA State Plan;
(D) be informed by the inventory system as set forth in subdivision
(4) of this subsection (e); and
(E) be reviewed and updated as necessary, but at least once every two
years;
(4) create, maintain, and update a publicly accessible inventory of all
known workforce education and employment and training programs and
activities in the State in order to:
(A) annually assess the investments and effectiveness of the
workforce development system;
(B) ensure coordination and nonduplication of workforce education
and employment and training activities; and
(C) identify best practices and gaps in the delivery of workforce
education and employment and training programs;
(5) identify and manage priority projects specific to regional workforce
needs;
VT LEG #379545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.48
2025 Page 9 of 10
(6) facilitate effective communication between the business community,
State and local government, and public and private educational institutions, for
the purpose of workforce pipeline development and job placement;
(7) coordinate intentional outreach and connections between students
and employment opportunities in the State; and
(8) ensure the State Workforce Development Board is carrying out its
duties and responsibilities as set forth in section 541a of this chapter.
(f)(1) The Executive Director of the Office of Workforce Strategy and
Development shall, once every two years, issue a comprehensive biennial
workforce report to the Governor, the House Committees on Appropriations
and on Commerce and Economic Development, and the Senate Committees on
Appropriations and on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs,
on or before December 1, that includes an evaluation of the accomplishments
of the State workforce investment system and the performance of participating
agencies and institutions covering the previous two calendar years. The report
shall include identification of system priorities, need for future funding
requests, identification of proposed legislative and administrative changes, and
any other information relevant to the performance and future needs of the
workforce investment system. The report shall summarize performance and
outcome information submitted by federally and State-funded workforce
development and investment programs for all public and nonpublic programs.
VT LEG #379545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.48
2025 Page 10 of 10
(2) To the extent practicable, workforce reports required of the
Department of Labor, including the apprenticeship report required by 21
V.S.A. § 1113(e)(2), shall be incorporated into the comprehensive report
required by subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) The Executive Director of the Office of Workforce Strategy and
Development shall have the support and coordination of the Department of
Labor in developing and submitting the biennial report required by subdivision
(1) of this subsection.
(4) The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports)
shall not apply to the report to be made under subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379545 v.1